Vermont, session 2025-2026, S149.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Diesel Fuel Tax * * *
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 3003 is amended to read:
§ 3003. IMPOSITION OF TAX; EXCEPTIONS
(a)(1) A tax of $0.28 in the amount set forth in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, a fee of $0.01 established pursuant to the provisions of 10 V.S.A.
§ 1942, and a $0.03 motor fuel transportation infrastructure assessment, which
for purposes of the International Fuel Tax Agreement only shall be deemed to
be a surcharge, are imposed on each gallon of fuel:
(1)(A) sold or delivered by a distributor; or
(2)(B) used by a user.
VT LEG #382268 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.149
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) The amount of the tax on each gallon of fuel pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection shall, before July 1, 2028, be $0.28. Beginning on July
1, 2028, and on each subsequent July 1, the amount of the tax shall increase by
the percentage change in the Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the 12-month period preceding the
previous April 1. The amount of the tax shall remain the same as the previous
year if the percentage change in the CPI-U for the 12-month period preceding
the previous April 1 is negative.
* * *
* * * Gasoline Tax * * *
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 3106 is amended to read:
§ 3106. IMPOSITION, RATE, AND PAYMENT OF TAX
(a)(1) Except for sales of motor fuels between distributors licensed in this
State, which sales shall be exempt from the taxes and assessments authorized
under this section, unless exempt under the laws of the United States at the
time of filing the report required by section 3108 of this title, each distributor
shall pay to the Commissioner:
(A) a tax of $0.121 in the amount set forth pursuant to subdivision (6)
of this subsection (a) upon each gallon of motor fuel sold by the distributor;
and
* * *
VT LEG #382268 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.149
2025 Page 3 of 3
(6) The amount of the tax on each gallon of motor fuel pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall, before July 1, 2028, be $0.28.
Beginning on July 1, 2028, and on each subsequent July 1, the amount of the
tax shall increase by the percentage change in the Bureau of Labor Statistics
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the 12-month
period preceding the previous April 1. The amount of the tax shall the same as
the previous year if the percentage change in the CPI-U for the 12-month
period preceding the previous April 1 is negative.
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #382268 v.2